Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 8. Emergency Medical Services and Trauma System

§ 35-1-801.
Department of health to develop comprehensive emergency medical services and trauma system.

The department of health shall develop a comprehensive emergency medical services and trauma system.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 94, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 1, effective February 26, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The department shall report annual progress on the system to the legislature.”

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

§ 35-1-802.
Designation of trauma areas; trauma system hospitals.

The department of health shall designate within the state trauma areas consistent with local resources, geography and current patient referral patterns.

Each trauma area shall have:

Medical control for all field care and transportation consistent with geographic and current communications capability;

Specified triage protocols;

Hospitals categorized according to existing standards of the department.

On and after July 1, 1993, the department may designate trauma system hospitals in areas that meet state objectives and standards.

On or after July 1, 1994, the department may implement area trauma system plans.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 35-1-803.
Trauma system hospitals designation.

Applications to be categorized or designated as trauma system hospitals shall be made upon forms provided by the department of health.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 94, § 1.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 160, §§ 1 through 3, appropriates $ 2,500,000 from the general fund to the department of health to institute a program to pay hospitals for unreimbursed trauma care. Acute care hospitals are to be reimbursed on a per incident basis, subject to the following: (1) there is compliance with the reporting requirements of the Wyoming trauma care program registry before the request for reimbursement; (2) reimbursement is available for costs incurred after June 30, 2005 and before July 1, 2006; and (3) requests for reimbursement may be submitted to the health department for payment only after 180 days have elapsed from the date the bill for the services rendered was sent to the patient or his representative. The department is to promulgate rules and regulations to administer this program on behalf of the state of Wyoming, which are to include provisions for ensuring that reimbursements do not exceed the appropriated funds, limiting reimbursement to the necessary support of the poor, preventing duplication from this appropriation and insurance, and reimbursing hospitals for trauma service costs. The department may contract with a fiscal agent to make the actual payments and conduct any necessary audits of reimbursement requests. The department is not to reimburse any one acute care hospital in a cumulative amount greater than 25% of the amount appropriated by the act unless the department reasonably concludes, as of May 31, 2006, that the appropriation will not be fully expended, at which time the remaining funds may be used to reimburse hospitals on a pro rata basis above the 25% limit. In addition to the appropriation to carry out the purpose of the program, 50,000 is appropriated to administer the program. On or before December 1, 2005, the department of health is to report to the joint appropriations and the joint labor, health and social services interim committees on the status of the program including costs of services and how funds have been expended.

Laws 2005, ch. 160, § 4, makes act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 35-1-804.
Department of health to promulgate rules; contents.

The department shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations which specify state trauma system objectives and standards, hospital categorization criteria and criteria and procedures to be utilized in designating trauma system hospitals and for the prevention of trauma and injuries. The rules shall be in conformance with the most current standards of the American college of surgeons committee on trauma standards, but may be expanded into further categories.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 35-1-805.
Duties of the department of health.

The department of health shall identify the causes of trauma in Wyoming and propose programs of prevention thereof for consideration by the legislature, health care providers and other agencies concerned with accident prevention or aftercare.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 94, § 1.